Illinois, session 104th, HB2295.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The County Jail Good Behavior Allowance Act is 5amended by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (730 ILCS 130/1)  (from Ch. 75, par. 30)7    Sec. 1. This Act shall be known and and may be cited as the 8"County Jail Good Behavior Allowance Act".9(Source: P.A. 83-1073.)